Utah statutes.
63H-1-601.   Resolution authorizing issuance of authority bonds --
Characteristics of bonds.
(1)  The authority may not issue bonds under this part unless the authority
board first adopts a resolution authorizing their issuance.
(2) (a)  As provided in the authority resolution authorizing the issuance of
bonds under this part or the trust indenture under which the bonds are issued,
bonds issued under this part may be issued in one or more series and may be
sold at public or private sale and in the manner provided in the resolution or
indenture.
(b)  Bonds issued under this part shall bear the date, be payable at the time,
bear interest at the rate, be in the denomination and in the form, carry the
conversion or registration privileges, have the rank or priority, be executed
in the manner, be subject to the terms of redemption or tender, with or
without premium, be payable in the medium of payment and at the place, and
have other characteristics as provided in the authority resolution authorizing
their issuance or the trust indenture under which they are issued.
